North Carolina statutes. Chapter 97. Workers’ Compensation Act.
Article 1. Workers’ Compensation Act.
§ 97-26.2.
Reimbursement for prescription drugs, prescribed over-the-counter drugs, and professional pharmaceutical services.

The reimbursement amount for prescription drugs, prescribed over-the-counter drugs, and professional pharmaceutical services shall be limited to the lesser of ninety-five percent (95%) of the average wholesale price (AWP) of the product, calculated on a per unit basis, as of the date of dispensing or the reimbursement amount provided for in an agreement between the dispensing health care provider and the payor employer or workers’ compensation insurance carrier.

All of the following shall apply to the reimbursement for prescription drugs and professional pharmaceutical services:

A health care provider seeking reimbursement for health care provider-dispensed prescription drugs, prescribed over-the-counter drugs, and pharmaceutical services shall include the original manufacturer’s National Drug Code (NDC) number, as assigned by the United States Food and Drug Administration, on any billing documents or invoices issued.

In no event may a health care provider receive reimbursement in excess of ninety-five percent (95%) of the AWP of the drugs dispensed by a health care provider, as determined by reference to the original manufacturer’s NDC number.

A repackaged NDC number may not be individually used on any billing documents or invoices issued and will not be considered the original manufacturer’s NDC number. A repackaged NDC number may only appear in conjunction with the manufacturer’s NDC number. If a health care provider seeking reimbursement for drugs dispensed by a health care provider does not include the original manufacturer’s NDC number on any billing documents or invoices issued, reimbursement shall be limited to one hundred percent (100%) of the AWP of the least expensive clinically equivalent drug, calculated on a per unit basis.

No outpatient health care provider, other than a licensed pharmacy, may receive reimbursement for a Schedule II controlled substance, as defined in G.S. 90-90, a Schedule III controlled substance, as defined in G.S. 90-91, a Schedule IV controlled substance, as defined in G.S. 90-92, or a Schedule V controlled substance, as defined in G.S. 90-93, dispensed in excess of an initial five-day supply, commencing upon the employee’s initial treatment following injury. Reimbursement under this subdivision shall be made for the five-day supply at the rates provided in this section.

For purposes of this section, the term “clinically equivalent” means a drug has chemical equivalents which, when administered in the same amounts, will provide essentially the same therapeutic effect as measured by the control of a symptom or disease.

History.

2014-100, s. 15.16A(a); 2015-241, s. 15.13B(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 15.13B(a), effective October 1, 2015, substituted “drugs, prescribed over-the-counter drugs” for “drugs” in the section heading; in subsection (a), substituted “amount for drugs, prescribed over-the-counter drugs, and” for “for prescription drugs and”, inserted “the lesser of”, and added “or the reimbursement amount provided for in an agreement between the dispensing health care provider and the payor employer or workers’ compensation insurance carrier”; and rewrote subdivisions (b)(1) through (4).

§ 97-27.
Medical examination; facts not privileged; refusal to be examined suspends compensation; other medical opinions; autopsy.

After an injury, and so long as the employee claims compensation, the employee, if so requested by his or her employer or ordered by the Industrial Commission, shall submit to independent medical examinations, at reasonable times and places, by a duly qualified physician who is licensed and practicing in North Carolina and is designated and paid by the employer or the Industrial Commission, even if the employee’s claim has been denied pursuant to G.S. 97-18(c). The independent medical examination shall be subject to the following provisions:

The injured employee has the right to have present at the independent medical examination any physician provided and paid by the employee.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 8-53

, no fact communicated to or otherwise learned by any physician who may have attended or examined the employee, or who may have been present at any examination, shall be privileged with respect to a claim before the Industrial Commission.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 97-25.6

to the contrary, an employer or its agent shall be allowed to openly communicate either orally or in writing with an independent medical examiner chosen by the employer regardless of whether the examiner physically examined the employee.

If the examiner physically examined the employee, the employer must produce the examiner’s report to the employee within 10 business days of receipt by the employer, along with a copy of all documents and written communication sent to the independent medical examiner pertaining to the employee.

If the employee refuses to submit to or in any way obstructs an independent medical examination requested and provided by the employer, the employee’s right to compensation and to take or prosecute any proceedings under this Article shall be suspended pursuant to

G.S. 97-18.1

until the refusal or objection ceases, and no compensation shall at any time be payable for the period of obstruction, unless in the opinion of the Industrial Commission the circumstances justify the refusal or obstruction. When the employer seeks to suspend compensation under this subdivision, it shall not be necessary for the employer to have first obtained an order compelling the employee to submit to the proposed independent medical examination. Any order issued by the Commission suspending compensation pursuant to

G.S. 97-18.1

shall specify what action the employee should take to end the suspension and reinstate the compensation.

In any case arising under this Article in which the employee is dissatisfied with the percentage of permanent disability as provided by

G.S. 97-31

and determined by the authorized health care provider, the employee is entitled to have another examination solely on the percentage of permanent disability provided by a duly qualified physician of the employee’s choosing who is licensed to practice in North Carolina, or licensed in another state if agreed to by the parties or ordered by the Commission, and designated by the employee. That physician shall be paid by the employer in the same manner as health care providers designated by the employer or the Industrial Commission are paid. The Industrial Commission must either disregard or give less weight to the opinions of the duly qualified physician chosen by the employee pursuant to this subsection on issues outside the scope of the G.S. 97-27(b) examination. No fact that is communicated to or otherwise learned by any physician who attended or examined the employee, or who was present at any examination, shall be privileged with respect to a claim before the Industrial Commission. Provided, however, that all travel expenses incurred in obtaining the examination shall be paid by the employee.

The employer, or the Industrial Commission, has the right in any case of death to require an autopsy at its expense.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 27; 1959, c. 732; 1969, c. 135; 1973, c. 520, s. 2; 1977, c. 511; 1991, c. 636, s. 3; 2011-287, s. 9; 2012-135, s. 5.

Cross References.

As to application of this section to certain State law-enforcement officers, see

G.S. 143-166.15

.

§ 97-28.
Seven-day waiting period; exceptions.

No compensation, as defined in

G.S. 97-2(11)

, shall be allowed for the first seven calendar days of disability resulting from an injury, except the benefits provided for in

G.S. 97-25

. Provided however, that in the case the injury results in disability of more than 21 days, the compensation shall be allowed from the date of the disability. Nothing in this section shall prevent an employer from allowing an employee to use paid sick leave, vacation or annual leave, or disability benefits provided directly by the employer during the first seven calendar days of disability.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 28; 1983, c. 599; 1987, c. 729, s. 5.

§ 97-29.
Rates and duration of compensation for total incapacity.

When an employee qualifies for total disability, the employer shall pay or cause to be paid, as hereinafter provided by subsections (b) through (d) of this section, to the injured employee a weekly compensation equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of his average weekly wages, but not more than the amount established annually to be effective January 1 as provided herein, nor less than thirty dollars ($30.00) per week.

When a claim is compensable pursuant to G.S. 97-18(b), paid without prejudice pursuant to G.S. 97-18(d), agreed by the parties pursuant to

G.S. 97-82

, or when a claim has been deemed compensable following a hearing pursuant to

G.S. 97-84

, the employee qualifies for temporary total disability subject to the limitations noted herein. The employee shall not be entitled to compensation pursuant to this subsection greater than 500 weeks from the date of first disability unless the employee qualifies for extended compensation under subsection (c) of this section.

An employee may qualify for extended compensation in excess of the 500-week limitation on temporary total disability as described in subsection (b) of this section only if (i) at the time the employee makes application to the Commission to exceed the 500-week limitation on temporary total disability as described in subsection (b) of this section, 425 weeks have passed since the date of first disability and (ii) pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 97-84

, unless agreed to by the parties, the employee shall prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the employee has sustained a total loss of wage-earning capacity. If an employee makes application for extended compensation pursuant to this subsection and is awarded extended compensation by the Commission, the award shall not be stayed pursuant to

G.S. 97-85

or

G.S. 97-86

until the full Commission or an appellate court determines otherwise. Upon its own motion or upon the application of any party in interest, the Industrial Commission may review an award for extended compensation in excess of the 500-week limitation on temporary total disability described in subsection (b) of this section, and, on such review, may make an award ending or continuing extended compensation. When reviewing a prior award to determine if the employee remains entitled to extended compensation, the Commission shall determine if the employer has proven by a preponderance of the evidence that the employee no longer has a total loss of wage-earning capacity. When an employee is receiving full retirement benefits under section 202(a) of the Social Security Act, after attainment of retirement age, as defined in section 216(l) of the Social Security Act, the employer may reduce the extended compensation by one hundred percent (100%) of the employee’s retirement benefit. The reduction shall consist of the employee’s primary benefit paid pursuant to section 202(a) of the Social Security Act but shall not include any dependent or auxiliary benefits paid pursuant to any other section of the Social Security Act, if any, or any cost-of-living increases in benefits made pursuant to section 215(i) of the Social Security Act.

An injured employee may qualify for permanent total disability only if the employee has one or more of the following physical or mental limitations resulting from the injury:

The loss of both hands, both arms, both feet, both legs, both eyes, or any two thereof, as provided by G.S. 97-31(17).

Spinal injury involving severe paralysis of both arms, both legs, or the trunk.

Severe brain or closed head injury as evidenced by severe and permanent:

Sensory or motor disturbances;

Communication disturbances;

Complex integrated disturbances of cerebral function; or

Neurological disorders.

Second-degree or third-degree burns to thirty-three percent (33%) or more of the total body surface.An employee who qualifies for permanent total disability pursuant to this subsection shall be entitled to compensation, including medical compensation, during the lifetime of the injured employee, unless the employer shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the employee is capable of returning to suitable employment as defined in

G.S. 97-2(22)

. Provided, however, the termination or suspension of compensation because the employee is capable of returning to suitable employment as defined in

G.S. 97-2(22)

does not affect the employee’s entitlement to medical compensation. An employee who qualifies for permanent total disability under subdivision (1) of this subsection is entitled to lifetime compensation, including medical compensation, regardless of whether or not the employee has returned to work in any capacity. In no other case shall an employee be eligible for lifetime compensation for permanent total disability.

An employee shall not be entitled to benefits under this section or

G.S. 97-30

and

G.S. 97-31

at the same time.

Where an employee can show entitlement to compensation pursuant to this section or

G.S. 97-30

and a specific physical impairment pursuant to

G.S. 97-31

, the employee shall not collect benefits concurrently pursuant to both this section or

G.S. 97-30

and

G.S. 97-31

, but rather is entitled to select the statutory compensation which provides the more favorable remedy.

The weekly compensation payment for members of the North Carolina National Guard and the North Carolina State Defense Militia shall be the maximum amount established annually in accordance with subsection (i) of this section per week as fixed herein. The weekly compensation payment for deputy sheriffs, or those acting in the capacity of deputy sheriffs, who serve upon a fee basis, shall be thirty dollars ($30.00) a week as fixed herein.

An officer or member of the State Highway Patrol shall not be awarded any weekly compensation under the provisions of this section for the first two years of any incapacity resulting from an injury by accident arising out of and in the course of the performance by him of his official duties if, during such incapacity, he continues to be an officer or member of the State Highway Patrol, but he shall be awarded any other benefits to which he may be entitled under the provisions of this Article.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, on July 1 of each year, a maximum weekly benefit amount shall be computed. The amount of this maximum weekly benefit shall be derived by obtaining the average weekly insured wage, as defined in G.S. 96-1, by multiplying such average weekly insured wage by 1.10, and by rounding such figure to its nearest multiple of two dollars ($2.00), and this said maximum weekly benefit shall be applicable to all injuries and claims arising on and after January 1 following such computation. Such maximum weekly benefit shall apply to all provisions of this Chapter and shall be adjusted July 1 and effective January 1 of each year as herein provided.

If death results from the injury or occupational disease, then the employer shall pay compensation in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 97-38

.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 29; 1939, c. 277, s. 1; 1943, c. 502, s. 3; c. 543; c. 672, s. 2; 1945, c. 766; 1947, c. 823; 1949, c. 1017; 1951, c. 70, s. 1; 1953, c. 1135, s. 1; c. 1195, s. 2; 1955, c. 1026, s. 5; 1957, c. 1217; 1963, c. 604, s. 1; 1967, c. 84, s. 1; 1969, c. 143, s. 1; 1971, c. 281, s. 1; c. 321, s. 1; 1973, c. 515, s. 1; c. 759, s. 1; c. 1103, s. 1; c. 1308, ss. 1, 2; 1975, c. 284, s. 4; 1979, c. 244; 1981, c. 276, s. 2; c. 378, s. 1; c. 421, s. 3; c. 521, s. 2; c. 920, s. 1; 1987, c. 729, s. 6; 1991, c. 703, s. 4; 1999-456, s. 33(d); 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-287, s. 10; 2012-135, s. 6; 2013-2, s. 9(e); 2013-224, s. 19; 2013-410, s. 19.

Cross References.

As to certain State law-enforcement officers, see

G.S. 143-166.16

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in the first sentence of the third paragraph.

Session Laws 2011-287, s. 10, effective June 24, 2011, and applicable to claims arising on or after that date, substituted “Rates and duration of compensation” for “Compensation rates” in the section catchline; and rewrote the section.

Session Laws 2012-135, s. 6, substituted “when a claim has been deemed compensable following a hearing pursuant to

G.S. 97-84

” for
“when an employee proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the employee is unable to earn the same wages the employee had earned before the injury, either in the same or other employment” in the first sentence of subsection (b). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2013-2, s. 9(e), substituted “wage, as defined in G.S. 96-1” for “wage in accordance with G.S. 96-8(22)” in the second sentence of subsection (i). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2013-410, s. 19, effective August 23, 2013, substituted “subsection (i)” for “the last paragraph” in the first sentence of subsection (g).

Legal Periodicals.

For a discussion of this section, see 8 N.C.L. Rev. 427 (1930).

For comment on the 1943 amendments, see 21 N.C.L. Rev. 384 (1943).

As to the 1949 amendment, see 27 N.C.L. Rev. 495 (1949).

For a discussion of the increase in allowable recovery by the 1951 amendment, see 29 N.C.L. Rev. 428 (1951).

For note on average weekly wage and combination of wages, see 44 N.C.L. Rev. 1177 (1966).

For survey of 1978 administrative law, see 57 N.C.L. Rev. 831 (1979).

For note discussing the use of age, education, and work experience in determining disability in workers’ compensation cases, see 15 Wake Forest L. Rev. 570 (1979).

For survey of 1980 tort law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1239 (1981).

For comment on Morrison v. Burlington Indus.,

304 N.C. 1

, 282 S.E.2d 458 (1981), see 4 Campbell L. Rev. 107 (1981).

For survey of 1981 administrative law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1165 (1982).

For survey, “Vernon v. Stephen L. Mabe Builders: The Requirements of Fairness in Settlement Agreements Under the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act,” see 73 N.C.L. Rev. 2529 (1995).

For article, “Why Aren’t You Working?: Medlin with Proof of Disability Under the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act,” see 38 Campbell L. Rev. 211 (2016).

§ 97-29.1.
Increase in payments in cases for total and permanent disability occurring prior to July 1, 1973.

In all cases of total and permanent disability occurring prior to July 1, 1973, weekly compensation payments shall be increased effective July 1, 1977, to an amount computed by multiplying the number of calendar years prior to July 1, 1973, that the case arose by five percent (5%). Payments made by the employer or its insurance carrier by reason of such increase in weekly benefits may be deducted by such employer or insurance carrier from the tax levied on such employer or carrier pursuant to

G.S. 105-228.5

or

G.S. 97-100

. Every employer or insurance carrier claiming such deduction or credit shall verify such claim to the Secretary of Revenue or the Industrial Commission by affidavit or by such other method as may be prescribed by the Secretary of Revenue or the Industrial Commission.

History.

1977, c. 651.

§ 97-30.
Partial incapacity.

Except as otherwise provided in

G.S. 97-31

, where the incapacity for work resulting from the injury is partial, the employer shall pay, or cause to be paid, as hereinafter provided, to the injured employee during such disability, a weekly compensation equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the difference between his average weekly wages before the injury and the average weekly wages which he is able to earn thereafter, but not more than the amount established annually to be effective January 1 as provided in

G.S. 97-29

a week, and in no case shall the employee receive more than 500 weeks of payments under this section. Any weeks of payments made pursuant to

G.S. 97-29

shall be deducted from the 500 weeks of payments available under this section. An officer or member of the State Highway Patrol shall not be awarded any weekly compensation under the provisions of this section for the first two years of any incapacity resulting from an injury by accident arising out of and in the course of the performance by him of his official duties if, during such incapacity, he continues to be an officer or member of the State Highway Patrol, but he shall be awarded any other benefits to which he may be entitled under the provisions of this Article.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 30; 1943, c. 502, s. 4; 1947, c. 823; 1951, c. 70, s. 2; 1953, c. 1195, s. 3; 1955, c. 1026, s. 6; 1957, c. 1217; 1963, c. 604, s. 2; 1967, c. 84, s. 2; 1969, c. 143, s. 2; 1971, c. 281, s. 2; 1973, c. 515, s. 2; c. 759, s. 2; 1981, c. 276, s. 1; 2011-287, s. 11.

Cross References.

As to credits, see

G.S. 97-42

.

As to certain State law-enforcement officers, see

G.S. 143-166.16

.

§ 97-31.
Schedule of injuries; rate and period of compensation.

In cases included by the following schedule the compensation in each case shall be paid for disability during the healing period and in addition the disability shall be deemed to continue for the period specified, and shall be in lieu of all other compensation, including disfigurement, to wit:

For the loss of a thumb, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the average weekly wages during 75 weeks.

For the loss of a first finger, commonly called the index finger, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the average weekly wages during 45 weeks.

For the loss of a second finger, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the average weekly wages during 40 weeks.

For the loss of a third finger, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the average weekly wages during 25 weeks.

For the loss of a fourth finger, commonly called the little finger, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the average weekly wages during 20 weeks.

The loss of the first phalange of the thumb or any finger shall be considered to be equal to the loss of one half of such thumb or finger, and the compensation shall be for one half of the periods of time above specified.

The loss of more than one phalange shall be considered the loss of the entire finger or thumb: Provided, however, that in no case shall the amount received for more than one finger exceed the amount provided in this schedule for the loss of a hand.

For the loss of a great toe, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the average weekly wages during 35 weeks.

For the loss of one of the toes other than a great toe, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the average weekly wages during 10 weeks.

The loss of the first phalange of any toe shall be considered to be equal to the loss of one half of such toe, and the compensation shall be for one half of the periods of time above specified.

The loss of more than one phalange shall be considered as the loss of the entire toe.

For the loss of a hand, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the average weekly wages during 200 weeks.

For the loss of an arm, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the average weekly wages during 240 weeks.

For the loss of a foot, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the average weekly wages during 144 weeks.

For the loss of a leg, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the average weekly wages during 200 weeks.

For the loss of an eye, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the average weekly wages during 120 weeks.

The loss of both hands, or both arms, or both feet, or both legs, or both eyes, or any two thereof, shall constitute total and permanent disability, to be compensated according to the provisions of

G.S. 97-29

. The employee shall have a vested right in a minimum amount of compensation for the total number of weeks of benefits provided under this section for each member involved. When an employee dies from any cause other than the injury for which he is entitled to compensation, payment of the minimum amount of compensation shall be payable as provided in

G.S. 97-37

.

For the complete loss of hearing in one ear, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the average weekly wages during 70 weeks; for the complete loss of hearing in both ears, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the average weekly wages during 150 weeks.

Total loss of use of a member or loss of vision of an eye shall be considered as equivalent to the loss of such member or eye. The compensation for partial loss of or for partial loss of use of a member or for partial loss of vision of an eye or for partial loss of hearing shall be such proportion of the periods of payment above provided for total loss as such partial loss bears to total loss, except that in cases where there is eighty-five per centum (85%), or more, loss of vision in any eye, this shall be deemed “industrial blindness” and compensated as for total loss of vision of such eye.

The weekly compensation payments referred to in this section shall all be subject to the same limitations as to maximum and minimum as set out in

G.S. 97-29

.

In case of serious facial or head disfigurement, the Industrial Commission shall award proper and equitable compensation not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). In case of enucleation where an artificial eye cannot be fitted and used, the Industrial Commission may award compensation as for serious facial disfigurement.

In case of serious bodily disfigurement for which no compensation is payable under any other subdivision of this section, but excluding the disfigurement resulting from permanent loss or permanent partial loss of use of any member of the body for which compensation is fixed in the schedule contained in this section, the Industrial Commission may award proper and equitable compensation not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

For the total loss of use of the back, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the average weekly wages during 300 weeks. The compensation for partial loss of use of the back shall be such proportion of the periods of payment herein provided for total loss as such partial loss bears to total loss, except that in cases where there is seventy-five per centum (75%) or more loss of use of the back, in which event the injured employee shall be deemed to have suffered “total industrial disability” and compensated as for total loss of use of the back.

In case of the loss of or permanent injury to any important external or internal organ or part of the body for which no compensation is payable under any other subdivision of this section, the Industrial Commission may award proper and equitable compensation not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 31; 1931, c. 164; 1943, c. 502, s. 2; 1955, c. 1026, s. 7; 1957, c. 1221; c. 1396, ss. 2, 3; 1963, c. 424, ss. 1, 2; 1967, c. 84, s. 3; 1969, c. 143, s. 3; 1973, c. 515, s. 3; c. 759, s. 3; c. 761, ss. 1, 2; 1975, c. 164, s. 1; 1977, c. 892, s. 1; 1979, c. 250; 1987, c. 729, ss. 7, 8.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on the 1943 amendment, which rewrote this section, see 21 N.C.L. Rev. 384 (1943).

For note as to eye injuries and loss of vision, see 35 N.C.L. Rev. 443 (1957).

For survey of 1978 administrative law, see 57 N.C.L. Rev. 831 (1979).

For note discussing the use of age, education, and work experience in determining disability in workers’ compensation cases, see 15 Wake Forest L. Rev. 570 (1979).

For survey of 1980 tort law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1239 (1981).

For survey of 1981 administrative law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1165 (1982).

For survey of 1982 law on workers’ compensation, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1243 (1983).

For note discussing proof of causation requirement in occupational disease cases, in light of Rutledge v. Tultex Corp./Kings Yarn,

308 N.C. 85

, 301 S.E.2d 359 (1983), see 7 Campbell L. Rev. 99 (1984).

For survey, “The North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act of 1994: A Step in the Direction of Restoring Balance,” see 73 N.C.L. Rev. 2502 (1995).

For survey, “Vernon v. Stephen L. Mabe Builders: The Requirements of Fairness in Settlement Agreements Under the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act,” see 73 N.C.L. Rev. 2529 (1995).

§ 97-31.1.
Effective date of legislative changes in benefits.

Every act of the General Assembly that changes the benefits enumerated in this Chapter shall become law no later than June 1 and shall have an effective date of no earlier than January 1 of the year after which it is ratified.

History.

1981, c. 521, s. 3; 1995, c. 20, s. 11.

§ 97-32.
Refusal of injured employee to accept suitable employment as suspending compensation.

If an injured employee refuses suitable employment as defined by

G.S. 97-2(22)

, the employee shall not be entitled to any compensation at any time during the continuance of such refusal, unless in the opinion of the Industrial Commission such refusal was justified. Any order issued by the Commission suspending compensation pursuant to

G.S. 97-18.1

on the ground of an unjustified refusal of an offer of suitable employment shall specify what actions the employee should take to end the suspension and reinstate the compensation. Nothing in this Article prohibits an employer from contacting the employee directly about returning to suitable employment with contemporaneous notice to the employee’s counsel, if any.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 32; 2011-287, s. 12.

§ 97-32.1.
Trial return to work.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 97-32

, an employee may attempt a trial return to work for a period not to exceed nine months. During a trial return to work period, the employee shall be paid any compensation which may be owed for partial disability pursuant to

G.S. 97-30

. If the trial return to work is unsuccessful, the employee’s right to continuing compensation under

G.S. 97-29

shall be unimpaired unless terminated or suspended thereafter pursuant to the provisions of this Article.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 4.1.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey, “The North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act of 1994: A Step in the Direction of Restoring Balance,” see 73 N.C.L. Rev. 2502 (1995).

§ 97-32.2.
Vocational rehabilitation.

In a compensable claim, the employer may engage vocational rehabilitation services at any point during a claim, regardless of whether the employee has reached maximum medical improvement to include, among other services, a one-time assessment of the employee’s vocational potential, except vocational rehabilitation services may not be required if the employee is receiving benefits pursuant to G.S. 97-29(c) or G.S. 97-29(d). If the employee (i) has not returned to work or (ii) has returned to work earning less than seventy-five percent (75%) of the employee’s average weekly wages and is receiving benefits pursuant to

G.S. 97-30

, the employee may request vocational rehabilitation services, including education and retraining in the North Carolina community college or university systems so long as the education and retraining are reasonably likely to substantially increase the employee’s wage-earning capacity following completion of the education or retraining program. Provided, however, the seventy-five percent (75%) threshold is for the purposes of qualification for vocational rehabilitation benefits only and shall not impact a decision as to whether a job is suitable per

G.S. 97-2(22)

. The expense of vocational rehabilitation services provided pursuant to this section shall be borne by the employer in the same manner as medical compensation.

Vocational rehabilitation services shall be provided by either a qualified or conditional rehabilitation professional approved by the Industrial Commission. Unless the parties mutually agree to a vocational rehabilitation professional, the employer may make the initial selection. At any point during the vocational rehabilitation process, either party may request that the Industrial Commission order a change of vocational rehabilitation professional for good cause.

Vocational rehabilitation services shall include a vocational assessment and the formulation of an individualized written rehabilitation plan with the goal of substantially increasing the employee’s wage-earning capacity, and subject to the following provisions:

When performing a vocational assessment, the vocational rehabilitation professional should evaluate the employee’s medical and vocational circumstances, the employee’s expectations and specific requests for vocational training, benefits expected from vocational services, and other information significant to the employee’s employment potential. The assessment should also involve a face-to-face interview between the employee and the vocational rehabilitation professional to identify the specific type and sequence of appropriate services. If, at any point during vocational rehabilitation services, the vocational rehabilitation professional determines that the employee will not benefit from vocational rehabilitation services, the employer may terminate said services unless the Commission orders otherwise.

Following assessment, and after receiving input from the employee, the vocational rehabilitation professional shall draft an individualized written rehabilitation plan. The plan should be individually tailored to the employee based on the employee’s education, skills, experience, and aptitudes, with appropriate recommendations for vocational services, which may include appropriate retraining, education, or job placement. The plan may be changed or updated by mutual consent at any time during rehabilitation services. A written plan is not necessary if the vocational rehabilitation professional has been retained to perform a one-time assessment.

Specific vocational rehabilitation services may include, but are not limited to, vocational assessment, vocational exploration, sheltered workshop or community supported employment training, counseling, job analysis, job modification, job development and placement, labor market survey, vocational or psychometric testing, analysis of transferable skills, work adjustment counseling, job seeking skills training, on-the-job training, or training or education through the North Carolina community college or university systems.

Vocational rehabilitation services may be terminated by agreement of the parties or by order of the Commission.

Job placement activities may commence after completion of an individualized written rehabilitation plan. Return-to-work options should be considered, with order of priority given to returning the employee to suitable employment with the current employer, returning the employee to suitable employment with a new employer, and, if appropriate, formal education or vocational training to prepare the employee for suitable employment with the current employer or a new employer.

The refusal of the employee to accept or cooperate with vocational rehabilitation services when ordered by the Industrial Commission shall bar the employee from further compensation until such refusal ceases, and no compensation shall at any time be paid for the period of suspension, unless in the opinion of the Industrial Commission the circumstances justified the refusal. Any order issued by the Commission suspending compensation per

G.S. 97-18.1

shall specify what action the employee should take to end the suspension and reinstate the compensation.

History.

2011-287, s. 13; 2012-135, s. 7.

§ 97-33.
Prorating in event of earlier disability or injury.

If any employee is an epileptic, or has a permanent disability or has sustained a permanent injury in service in the United States Army or Navy, or in another employment other than that in which he received a subsequent permanent injury by accident, such as specified in

G.S. 97-31

, he shall be entitled to compensation only for the degree of disability which would have resulted from the later accident if the earlier disability or injury had not existed.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 33; 1975, c. 832; 2011-183, s. 127(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-183, s. 127(b), effective June 20, 2011, substituted “United States Army or Navy” for “army or navy of the United States.”

Legal Periodicals.

For note discussing limitations on the apportionment of disabilities, see 54 N.C.L. Rev. 1123 (1976).

For comment on Morrison v. Burlington Indus.,

304 N.C. 1

, 282 S.E.2d 458 (1981), see 4 Campbell L. Rev. 107 (1981).

§ 97-34.
Employee receiving an injury when being compensated for former injury.

If an employee receives an injury for which compensation is payable, while he is still receiving or entitled to compensation for a previous injury in the same employment, he shall not at the same time be entitled to compensation for both injuries, unless the later injury be a permanent injury such as specified in

G.S. 97-31

; but he shall be entitled to compensation for that injury and from the time of that injury which will cover the longest period and the largest amount payable under this Article.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 34.

§ 97-35.
How compensation paid for two injuries; employer liable only for subsequent injury.

If any employee receives a permanent injury as specified in

G.S. 97-31

after having sustained another permanent injury in the same employment, he shall be entitled to compensation for both injuries, but the total compensation shall be paid by extending the period and not by increasing the amount of weekly compensation, and in no case exceeding 500 weeks.

If an employee has previously incurred permanent partial disability through the loss of a hand, arm, foot, leg, or eye, and by subsequent accident incurs total permanent disability through the loss of another member, the employer’s liability is for the subsequent injury only.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 35.

Cross References.

As to additional payments to be made out of the Second Injury Fund in certain hardship cases, see

G.S. 97-40.1

.

Legal Periodicals.

For note discussing limitations on the apportionment of disabilities, see 54 N.C.L. Rev. 1123 (1976).

For comment on Morrison v. Burlington Indus.,

304 N.C. 1

, 282 S.E.2d 458 (1981), see 4 Campbell L. Rev. 107 (1981).